Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB910.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE X-ANATURAL GAS SEVERANCE TAXSection 1001-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Natural gas." A fossil fuel consisting of a mixture of hydrocarbon gases, primarily methane, possibly including ethane, propane, butane, pentane, carbon dioxide, oxygen, nitrogen and hydrogen sulfide and other gas species. The term includes natural gas from oil fields known as associated gas or casing head gas, natural gas fields known as nonassociated gas, coal beds, shale beds and other formations. The term does not include coal bed methane."Producer." A person who engages or continues within this Commonwealth in the business of severing natural gas for sale, profit or commercial use. The term does not include a person who severs natural gas from a storage field."Producing site." A point of severance capable of producing natural gas in paying quantities."Reporting period." A calendar month in which natural gas is severed."Sever." To extract or otherwise remove natural gas from the soil or water of this Commonwealth."Severance." The extraction or other removal of natural gas from the soil or water of this Commonwealth."Severing." Extracting or otherwise removing natural gas from the soil or water of this Commonwealth."Unit." A thousand cubic feet of natural gas measured at the wellhead at a temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit and an absolute pressure of 14.73 pounds per square inch in accordance with American Gas Association standards and according to Boyle's Law for the measurement of gas under varying pressures with deviations as follows:(1) The average absolute atmospheric pressure shall be 20250SB0910PN1037 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assumed to be 14.4 pounds to the square inch, regardless of elevation or location of point of delivery above sea level or variations in atmospheric pressure from time to time.(2) The temperature of the gas passing the meters shall be determined by the continuous use of a recording thermometer installed to properly record the temperature of gas flowing through the meters. The arithmetic average of the temperature recorded each 24-hour day shall be used in computing gas volumes. If a recording thermometer is not installed, or is installed and not operating properly, an average flowing temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit shall be used in computing gas volume.(3) The specific gravity of the gas shall be determined annually by tests made by the use of an Edwards or Acme gravity balance or at intervals as found necessary in practice. Specific gravity determinations shall be used in computing gas volumes.(4) The deviation of the natural gas from Boyle's Law shall be determined by annual tests or at other shorter intervals as found necessary in practice. The apparatus and method used in making the test shall be in accordance with the Report No. 3 of the Gas Measurement Committee of the American Gas Association or recommendations of the National Bureau of Standards or amendments to the report or recommendations. The results of the tests shall be used in computing the volume of gas delivered.Section 1002-A. Imposition of tax.(a) Establishment.--Beginning January 1, 2026, a natural gas severance tax shall be levied on every producer.(b) Rate.--For the 2026 calendar year and each calendar year 20250SB0910PN1037 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thereafter, the tax shall be imposed on the gross value of the units severed at the wellhead during a reporting period at a rate of 6.5%.Section 1003-A. Return and payment.(a) Requirement.--A producer shall file a return with the department, on a form prescribed by the department. The return shall include all of the following:(1) The number of natural gas units severed by the producer for the reporting period.(2) The number of producing sites used by the producer for the severance of natural gas in each county and municipality.(3) The amount of tax due under section 1002-A.(b) Filing.--The return required by subsection (a) shall be filed with the department within 15 days following the end of a reporting period. The first return shall be due February 15, 2026.(c) Deadline.--The tax imposed under section 1002-A shall be due on the day the return is required to be filed and shall become delinquent if not remitted to the department by that date.(d) Restricted receipts account.--The tax revenues collected under this article shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of Article X-A of the act.(2) The provisions of 58 Pa.C.S. § 2318 are repealed.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0910PN1037 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829